Washington statutes.
RCW 43.85.070

Deposits deemed in state treasury—Liability.

The state treasurer may deposit with any qualified public depositary which has fully complied with all requirements of law and the regulations of the public deposit protection commission any state moneys in his or her hands or under his or her official control and any sum so on deposit shall be deemed to be in the state treasury, and he or she shall not be liable for any loss thereof resulting from the failure or default of any such depositary without fault or neglect on his or her part or on the part of his or her assistants or clerks.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5162; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 18; 1965 c 8 s 43.85.070. Prior: 1945 c 129 s 2; 1943 c 134 s 1; 1935 c 139 s 3; 1931 c 87 s 2; 1907 c 37 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 5551.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 193: See notes following RCW 39.58.010.

Liability of treasurers and state treasurer for losses of deposits: RCW 39.58.140.